Utah statutes.
63A-13-501.   Duty to report potential Medicaid fraud to the office or fraud unit.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), a health care professional, a provider, or a state or local government official or employee who becomes aware of fraud, waste, or abuse shall report the fraud, waste, or abuse to the office or the fraud unit.

(b) (i)  The reporting exception in this Subsection (1)(b) does not apply to fraud and abuse.  Suspected fraud and abuse shall be reported in accordance with Subsection (1).

(ii)  If a person described in Subsection (1)(a) reasonably believes that the suspected waste is a mistake, and is not intentional or knowing, the person may first report the suspected waste to the provider, health care professional, or compliance officer for the provider or health care professional.

(iii)  The person described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii) shall report the suspected waste to the office or the fraud unit unless, within 30 days after the day on which the person reported the suspected waste to the provider, health care professional, or compliance officer, the provider, health care professional, or compliance officer demonstrates to the person that the suspected waste has been corrected.

(2)  A person who makes a report under Subsection (1) may request that the person's name not be released in connection with the investigation.

(3)  If a request is made under Subsection (2), the person's identity may not be released to any person or entity other than the office, the fraud unit, or law enforcement, unless a court of competent jurisdiction orders that the person's identity be released.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 12, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 359, 2013 General Session

